District of Columbia statutes.
4-215.01

Prohibition; immunity from legal process.

Public assistance awarded under this chapter shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable to any recipient under this chapter shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process, or the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1501, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-215.1.